Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 12
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

7-64-1201. Uniformity of application and construction.

This article shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this article among states enacting it.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 914, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.

7-64-1202. Title.

This article may be cited as the "Colorado Uniform Partnership Act (1997)".

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 914, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.

7-64-1203. Severability clause.

If any provision of this article or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this article which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this article are severable.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 914, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.

7-64-1204. Effective date.

This article takes effect January 1, 1998.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 915, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.

7-64-1205. Applicability.

This article governs only a partnership formed:

After January 1, 1998, unless that partnership is continuing the business of a partnership that has dissolved under section 7-60-141; and

Before January 1, 1998, that elects, as provided by subsection (2) of this section, to be governed by this article.

A partnership voluntarily may elect, in the manner provided in its partnership agreement or by law for amending the partnership agreement, to be governed by this article. The provisions of this article relating to the liability of the partnership's partners to third parties apply to limit those partners' liability to a third party who had done business with the partnership within one year preceding the partnership's election to be governed by this article, only if the third party has notice of the partnership's election to be governed by this article.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 915, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.

7-64-1206. Saving clause.

This article does not affect an action or proceeding commenced or right accrued before this article takes effect.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 915, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.